Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.217

Ignition interlock driver's license.

"Ignition interlock driver's license" means a permit issued to a person by the department that allows the person to operate a noncommercial motor vehicle with an ignition interlock device while the person's regular driver's license is suspended, revoked, or denied.

[ 2008 c 282 s 1.]